Louisiana, session 2026, HB19.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
11 Section 1. R.S. 11:1634(B)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
12 reenacted to read as follows:
13 §1634. Disability retirement
14 * * *
15 B. The board of trustees shall award disability benefits to eligible members
16 who have been officially certified as having a disability by the State Medical
17 Disability Board physician designated by the board of trustees. Upon retirement
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 19 ENROLLED
1 caused by disability, the disability benefit shall be determined as provided in
2 Paragraph (1) or Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, whichever is less:
3 * * *
4 Section 2. R.S. 11:1581(13) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.